Utah statutes.
73-18-16.   Regattas, races, exhibitions -- Rules.

(1)  The division may authorize the holding of regattas, motorboat or other boat races, marine parades, tournaments, or exhibitions on any waters of this state.

(2)  The board may adopt rules concerning the safety of vessels and persons, either as observers or participants, that do not conflict with the provisions of Subsections (3) and (4).

(3)  A person may elect, at the person's own risk, to wear a non-Coast Guard approved personal floatation device if the person is on an American Water Ski Association regulation tournament slalom course and is:

(a)  engaged in barefoot water skiing;

(b)  water skiing in an American Water Ski Association regulation competition;

(c)  a performer participating in a professional exhibition or other tournament; or

(d)  practicing for an event described in Subsection (3)(b) or (c).

(4)  If a person is water skiing in an American Water Ski Association regulation tournament slalom course, an observer and flag are not required if the vessel is:

(a)  equipped with a wide angle mirror with a viewing surface of at least 48 square inches; and

(b)  operated by a person who is at least 18 years of age.

